New York, session 2025-2026, A11532.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6 of chapter 704 of the laws of 2023 amending the 2 environmental conservation law relating to a Long Island deer management 3 pilot program, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 6. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 5 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed [three] six years after such date. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16034-01-6